Utah statutes.
10-7-12.   Scarcity of water -- Limitation on use.

In the event of scarcity of water the mayor of any city or the president of the board of trustees of any town may, by proclamation, limit the use of water for any purpose other than domestic purposes to such extent as may be required for the public good in the judgment of the board of commissioners or city council of any city or the board of trustees of any town.



No Change Since 1953

